Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-2854
Director; contract for administrative duties and responsibilities; supervisory authority.

The Director of Insurance may contract with an insurance company licensed to do business in the State of Nebraska to perform any administrative duties and responsibilities of the Department of Insurance pursuant to sections 44-2801 to 44-2855, with the Director of Insurance retaining supervisory authority over such insurance company.

Laws 1976, LB 434, § 54.